pt-PT: Tipo de disjuntores: Interruptor de circuito de falha de arco (AFCI); Disjuntor; Função dupla (AFCI/GFCI); Interruptor de circuito de falha de terra (GFCI); Padrão; Disjuntor termomagnético; Outro
en: Circuit breaker type: Arc-fault circuit interrupter (AFCI); Circuit breaker disconnect; Dual function (AFCI/GFCI); Ground-fault circuit interrupter (GFCI); Standard; Thermal-magnetic circuit breaker; Other
vi: Loại cầu dao tự động: Bộ ngắt mạch sự cố hồ quang (AFCI); Ngắt kết nối cầu dao; Chức năng kép (AFCI/GFCI); Thiết bị ngắt mạch chống giật (AFCI); Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Bộ ngắt mạch nhiệt từ; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta odklopnika: Prekinjevalec tokokroga zaradi napake obloka (AFCI); Odklop odklopnika; Dvojna funkcija (AFCI/GFCI); Prekinjevalec zemeljskega stika (GFCI); Standardna; Toplotno-magnetni odklopnik; Drugo
de: Leistungsschaltertyp: Fehlerlichtbogen-Schutzeinrichtung (AFCI); Leistungsschalter-Trennung; Doppelfunktion (AFCI/GFCI); Fehlerstrom-Schutzschalter (FI); Standard; Thermisch-magnetischer Schutzschalter; Sonstiges
el: Τύπος διακόπτη κυκλώματος: Διακόπτης κυκλώματος σφάλματος τόξου (AFCI); Αποσύνδεση διακόπτη κυκλώματος; Διπλή λειτουργία (AFCI/GFCI); Διακόπτης κυκλώματος σφάλματος γείωσης (GFCI); Κανονικό; Θερμομαγνητικός διακόπτης κυκλώματος; Άλλο
ja: 遮断器タイプ: アークフォルトサーキットインタラプター (AFCI); サーキットブレーカー切断; デュアル機能 (AFCI/GFCI); 漏電遮断器 (GFCI); スタンダード; 熱磁気式サーキットブレーカー; その他
da: Afbrydertype: Bue-fejl-afbryder (AFCI); Afbrydelse af strømafbryder; Dobbeltfunktion (AFCI/GFCI); Jordfejlskredsløbsafbryder (GFCI); Standard; Termisk-magnetisk afbryder; Andet
ko: 회로 차단기 유형: 아크 결함 회로 차단기(AFCI); 회로 차단기 분리; 듀얼 기능(AFCI/GFCI); 지락 회로 차단기(GFCI); 표준; 열자기 회로 차단기; 기타
zh-CN: 断路器类型: 电弧故障断路器 (AFCI); 断路器断开; 双功能 (AFCI/GFCI); 接地故障断路器 (GFCI); 标准; 热磁断路器; 其他
it: Tipo di interruttore: Interruttore di dispersione di terra (AFCI); Disconnessione dell'interruttore automatico; Doppia funzione (AFCI/GFCI); Interruttore differenziale (GFCI); Standard; Interruttore magnetotermico; Altro
tr: Devre Kesici Tipi: Ark hatası devre kesicisi (AFCI); Devre kesici bağlantısını kesme; Çift işlev (AFCI/GFCI); Topraklama hatası devre kesicisi (GFCI); Standart; Termik-manyetik devre kesici; Diğer
pl: Typ wyłącznika ochronnego: Przerywacz obwodu łukowo-zwarciowego (AFCI); Odłączenie wyłącznika obwodu; Podwójna funkcja (AFCI/GFCI); Przerywacz ziemnozwarciowy (GFCI); Standard; Wyłącznik termomagnetyczny; Inne
cs: Typ přístroje do rozvaděče: Přerušovač obloukového proudu (AFCI); Odpojovač; Duální funkce (AFCI/GFCI); Přerušovač obvodu zemního spojení (GFCI); Standardní; Tepelný magnetický jistič; Jiné
es: Tipo de disyuntor: Interruptor de circuito por fallo de arco (AFCI); Interruptor de circuito desconectador; Doble función (AFCI/GFCI); Interruptor de circuito con pérdida a tierra (GFCI); Estándar; Interruptor de circuito térmico-magnético; Otros
fi: Katkaisijatyyppi: Valokaarivikapiirikatkaisin (AFCI); Piirikatkaisijan irrottaja; Kaksoistoiminto (AFCI/GFCI); Maasulkuvirtakatkaisin GFCI; Tavallinen; Lämpömagneettinen katkaisija; Muu
zh-TW: 斷路器類型: 電弧故障斷路器（AFCI）; 斷路器斷開; 雙功能 (AFCI/GFCI); 接地故障斷路器 (GFCI); 標準; 熱磁斷路器; 其他
hu: Áramköri megszakító típusa: Ívzárlatvédelmi megszakító (AFCI); Áramköri megszakító leválasztása; Kettős funkció (AFCI/GFCI); Földzárlatvédelmi megszakító (GFCI); Normál; Termikus-mágneses megszakító; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип електрически прекъсвач: Прекъсвач на веригата при повреда на дъгата (AFCI); Изключване на прекъсвача; Двойна функция (AFCI/GFCI); Прекъсвач на веригата при неизправност (GFCI); Стандартен; Термо-магнитен прекъсвач; Други
pt-BR: Tipo de disjuntor: Interruptor de circuito de falha de arco (AFCI); Desconexão do disjuntor; Dual function (AFCI/GFCI); Interruptor de circuito de falha à terra (GFCI); Padrão; Disjuntor termomagnético; Outro
ru: Тип автоматического выключателя: Дуговой выключатель (AFCI); Отключение автоматического выключателя; Двойная функция (AFCI/GFCI); Заземляющий выключатель (GFCI); Стандартный; Термомагнитный выключатель; Другое
sk-SK: Typ ističa: Prerušovač obvodu pri oblúkovom výboji (AFCI); Odpojenie ističa; Dvojitá funkcia (AFCI/GFCI); Prerušovač obvodu pri poruche uzemnenia (GFCI); Štandardný; Tepelno-magnetický istič; Iné
fr: Type de disjoncteur: Disjoncteur anti-arc (AFCI); Débranchement du disjoncteur; Double fonction (AFCI/GFCI); Disjoncteur de fuite à la terre; Standard; Disjoncteur magnéto-thermique; Autre
nl: Zekeringtype: Arc-fault-stroomonderbrekers (AFCI); Stroomonderbreker ontkoppelen; Dubbele functie (AFCI/GFCI); Aardlekstroomonderbreker (GFCI); Standaard; Thermisch-magnetische stroomonderbreker; Andere
hr-HR: Vrsta prekidača: Prekidač strujnog kruga u slučaju kvara (AFCI); Isključivanje prekidača strujnog kruga; Dvostruka funkcija (AFCI/GFCI); Prekidač za zaostalu struju (GFCI); Standardni; Termomagnetski prekidač; Ostalo
sv: Strömbrytartyp: Arc-fault circuit breaker (AFCI); Frånkoppling av strömbrytaren; Dubbelfunktion (AFCI/GFCI); Jordfelsbrytare (JFB); Standard; Termisk-magnetisk strömbrytare; Övrigt
lt-LT: Srovės pertraukiklio tipas: Lanko gedimo grandinės pertraukiklis (AFCI); Srovės pertraukiklio atjungimas; Dviguba funkcija (AFCI / GFCI); Įžemėjimo grandinės pertraukiklis (AFCI); Standartinis; Terminis-magnetinis grandinės pertraukiklis; Kita
ro-RO: Tip întrerupător de circuit: Întreruptor de detectare a defectelor de arc (AFCI); Disjunctor; Funcție dublă (AFCI/GFCI); Întrerupător de protecție la defecțiune circuit de împământare (GFCI); Standard; Întrerupător termic-magnetic; Altele
nb: Strømbrytertype: Buefeilkretsbrytere (AFCI); Bryterfrakobling; Dobbel funksjon (AFCI/GFCI); Jordfeilkretsbryter (GFCI); Standard; Termisk-magnetisk bryter; Annet
th: ประเภทตัวตัดวงจร: ตัวตัดวงจรเนื่องด้วยความบกพร่องจากอาร์ค (AFCI); ยกเลิกการเชื่อมตัวตัดวงจร; ฟังก์ชันคู่ (AFCI/GFCI); ตัวตัดวงจรเนื่องด้วยความบกพร่องจากกราวด์ (GFCI); มาตรฐาน; ตัวตักวงจรแบบเทอร์มัลแมกเนติก; อื่นๆ